Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-151
Cooperative extension work; federal aid; acceptance; payment of warrants.

The whole and complete acceptance of the Legislature of Nebraska, acting for the people of the State of Nebraska, is hereby given to the provisions and requirements of the Act of Congress, approved May 22, 1928, Chapter 687, section 1, 45 Stat. at L. The State Treasurer is authorized to receive the grants of money appropriated by Congress and to pay warrants drawn by the Director of Administrative Services upon certificates presented by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska in payment of expenses of the Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Nebraska in accordance with the terms and conditions specified in the Act of Congress.

Laws 1929, c. 12, § 1, p. 85;

C.S.1929, § 85-154;

R.S.1943, § 85-151;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 68.